Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-116] Reciprocity. (a) The
commissioner shall waive any requirements for a nonresident license applicant
with a valid license from the applicant's home state, except the requirements
imposed by section 431:9A-108, so long as the applicant's home state awards
nonresident licenses to residents of this State on the same basis.

(b) A nonresident producer's satisfaction of
the producer's home state's continuing education requirements for licensed
insurance producers shall constitute satisfaction of this State's continuing
education requirements so long as the nonresident producer's home state
recognizes the satisfaction of its continuing education requirements imposed
upon producers from this State on the same basis. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next